Illinois, session 104th, HB4180.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-2007 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-2007)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-2007)7    Sec. 3-2007. Office quarters and hours; violation. The 8county clerk shall keep the clerk's office at the court house 9of the county, or at such other place as may be provided for 10the clerk by the authorities of such county seat and shall keep 11the office open and attend to the duties thereof:12        (a) In counties of 500,000 or more population from 9 13    a. m. to 5 p. m. of each working day except Saturday 14    afternoons and legal holidays, but the clerk may open the 15    office at 8 a. m. on each working day:16        (b) In counties of less than 500,000 population from 8 17    a. m. to 5 p. m. of each working day except Saturdays and 18    legal holidays, but in such counties the office shall 19    remain open until noon the Saturday before general, 20    primary or special election days.21    However, Provided, that the days on which the county 22clerk's such office shall be open and the hours of opening and 23closing of the office of the county clerk may be changed and   HB4180- 2 -LRB104 15916 RTM 29146 b1otherwise fixed and determined by the county board of any 2county, except that the county clerk's office shall be closed 3on all legal holidays. Any such action taken by the county 4board shall be by an appropriate resolution passed at a 5regular meeting.6    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, when 7any election is held and the results of such election are 8required by law to be returned to the county clerk, the office 9of the county clerk shall remain open for the purpose of 10receiving such results from the time of opening of the polls 11until the returns from each precinct have been received.12    Any county clerk who fails to keep the clerk's office open 13for the purpose of receiving election returns as required by 14this Section commits a business offense, and shall be fined 15not less than $500 nor more than $5,000.16(Source: P.A. 101-253, eff. 8-9-19.)